Massachusetts, session 194th, H3500.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 34B of chapter 164 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
adding the following sentence:- A city or town may enforce this section by the enactment of a 
local ordinance or bylaw prohibiting double poles beyond 12 months, authorized by this section, 
violation of which may be punishable by a fine to be imposed on the owner of such double poles 
not to exceed a maximum of $2,500 per occurrence.